New York, session 2025-2026, A4539.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Subparagraph (i) of paragraph (a) of subdivision 3 of 2 section 467 of the real property tax law, as amended by section 2 of 3 part K of chapter 59 of the laws of 2023, is amended to read as follows: 4 (i) if the income of the owner or the combined income of the owners of 5 the property for the applicable income tax year exceeds the sum of three 6 thousand dollars, or such other sum not less than three thousand dollars 7 nor more than [fifty] seventy-five thousand dollars, as may be provided 8 by the local law, ordinance or resolution adopted pursuant to this 9 section. 10 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD00271-01-5